Idaho, session 2025, H0437.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 50-3101, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
50-3101. PURPOSE, RELATIONSHIP WITH OTHER LAWS AND SHORT TITLE. (1)
The purpose of this chapter is:
(a) To encourage the funding and construction of regional community in-
frastructure in advance of actual developmental growth that creates the
need for such additional infrastructure;
(b) To provide a means for the advance payment of development impact
fees established in chapter 82, title 67, Idaho Code, and the community
infrastructure that may be financed thereby; and
(c) To create additional financial tools and financing mechanisms that
allow new growth to more expediently pay for itself.
(2) Only community infrastructure to be publicly owned by this state or
a political subdivision thereof may be financed pursuant to this chapter.
(3) A community infrastructure district may only be formed pursuant to
this chapter only by a city in the city's incorporated area, or by a county
in an area contained within a city's comprehensive plan with the city's con-
sent, or by a county when the district is outside of a city's comprehensive
plan.
(4) A community infrastructure district may be formed only after (i)
prior review and approval by the governing body of each county or city in
which the district is proposed to be located of a petition requesting the
formation of the district, and (ii) the necessary approvals for site de-
velopment under the local land use planning act, sections 67-6501 et seq.,
Idaho Code, and the planning and zoning ordinances of each county and city
in which the district is proposed to be located have been obtained; provided
however, that where there will be phased development, approvals obtained
for the first phase of site development shall be sufficient for the initial
creation and organization of the district. The formation of a district
pursuant to this chapter shall not prevent the exercise by a county, city
or other political subdivision of any of its powers on the same basis as on
all other land within its jurisdiction. Notwithstanding the formation of a
district, the development of real property located within the district shall
remain subject to the provisions of chapter 65, title 67, Idaho Code, and
the applicable planning and zoning ordinances of the counties and cities in
which the district is located. The formation of a district pursuant to this


chapter shall not prevent the subsequent establishment of other districts or
the improvement or assessment of land within the district by a county, city
or other political subdivision.
(5) This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Community In-
frastructure District Act."
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.